Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 8. Virginia Research Investment Committee.

§§ 23.1-3130,
23.1-3131.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1164 and 1169, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the Commonwealth of Virginia Innovation Partnership Act, see Article 11 (§

2.2-2351

et seq.). For transition provisions, see Editor’s notes under §

2.2-2351

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

23.1-3130

, pertaining to definition, derived from Acts
2016, c. 775,
§ 23-304;
2017, cc. 796,
816.

Former § 23.1-3131, pertaining to the Virginia Research Investment Fund, derived from Acts
2016, c. 775,
§ 23-305;
2017, cc. 314,
796,
816.

§ 23.1-3132.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc 1164 and 1169, cls. 2 and 8, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

23.1-3132

, pertaining to Virginia Research Investment Committee; report, derived from Acts
2016, c. 775,
§ 23-306;
2017, cc. 796,
816;
2018, c. 332.

Acts
2020, cc. 1164 and
1169, cl. 8 provides: “That the provisions of this act repealing
§§

2.2-2220

and

23.1-3132

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective January 1, 2021. The Board of Directors of the Innovation and Entrepreneurship Investment Authority and the Virginia Research Investment Committee shall assist in the transition of its responsibilities to the Commonwealth of Virginia Innovative Partnership Authority (the Authority) no later than January 1, 2021.”

§§ 23.1-3133,
23.1-3134.

Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 1164 and 1169, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the Commonwealth of Virginia Innovation Partnership Act, see Article 11 (§

2.2-2351

et seq.). For transition provisions, see Editor’s notes under §

2.2-2351

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

23.1-3133

, pertaining to awards from the Virginia Research Investment Fund, derived from Acts
2016, c. 775,
§ 23-307;
2017, cc. 314,
796,
816.

Former § 23.1-3134, pertaining to the Commonwealth Research and Technology Strategic Roadmap, derived from Acts
2017, cc. 796,
816.